Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2083.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 5 O.S. 2021, Section 18, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 18. A. The requirement for payment of annual dues


pursuant to Section 1 of Article VIII of the Oklahoma Bar


Association Rules shall be voluntary. Any payment of such dues


shall be made solely at the discretion of a person who has been


admitted to practice as an attorney in this state. The Supreme


Court shall promulgate rules related to the practice of law in this


state including, but not limited to, requirements for continuing

Req. No. 3105 Page 1


education, annual registration and any fees necessary to cover costs


of such education, registration or other requirements imposed by the


Court. Any fees required by such rules shall be used only for core


association functions and shall not be used for lobbying or other


political purposes.


B. Any person who has been admitted to practice as an attorney


in this state, who is a member in good standing of the bar of this


state, and who meets all requirements for licensure in this state


may apply for status as an inactive member of the bar.


B. C. The application for such status shall contain:


1. The person’s name, bar number, residence address, telephone


number or numbers where he or she can be reached;


2. The reason or reasons he or she desires such status;


3. A statement that he or she understands that, while on such


status, he or she may not do anything which constitutes the practice


of law while in this state;


4. A statement that he or she has notified all of his or her


clients in this state that he or she is no longer practicing in this


state; and


5. An affidavit that the information given is true and correct.


C. D. Immediately upon receipt of the application, the Supreme


Court or its designee shall acknowledge the application and enter


the person’s name on a roll of inactive attorneys.



Req. No. 3105 Page 2


D. E. While on inactive status, an attorney shall not be


required to complete any continuing legal education requirements and


shall be required to pay only twenty percent (20%) of the annual


dues of an active member.


E. F. While on inactive status, an attorney shall not receive


the Oklahoma Bar Journal or any other services from the Oklahoma Bar


Association except upon such terms and conditions, including payment


of charges and fees, as shall be established by the Association.


F. G. Once on inactive status, an attorney may reactivate his


or her license to practice upon payment of the equivalent of one


year’s annual dues to the Association and upon successful completion


of one year’s mandatory continuing legal education requirement.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 70 of Title 5, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The Legislature shall have the power to request or otherwise


require information about complaints filed with and disciplinary


actions taken by the Oklahoma Bar Association. The Legislature may


hold hearings for the purpose of inquiring about misconduct by


lawyers, judges, or Oklahoma Bar Association employees or officials


that is relevant to the legal profession. The Legislature shall


have the power to subpoena documents, records, or persons to attend


such hearings.



Req. No. 3105 Page 3


B. Any disciplinary action or proceeding taken or held by the


Oklahoma Bar Association shall permit public representation in the


interest of transparency. Disciplinary bodies of the Oklahoma Bar


Association shall have at least one member that is not a licensed


attorney.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3105 BLB 1/15/2026 12:10:12 PM

































Req. No. 3105 Page 4